Georgia statutes. 
C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2118 et seq., 2184 et seq.

36-63-10. Obligations of authority not indebtedness of state or political subdivisions.

Statute text

No bonds or other obligations of and no indebtedness incurred by any authority shall constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the State of Georgia or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof, nor shall any act of any authority in any manner constitute or result in the creation of an indebtedness of this state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision. All such bonds and obligations shall be payable solely from the revenues therein pledged to such payment, including pledged rentals, sales proceeds, insurance proceeds, and condemnation awards; and no holder or holders of any such bonds or obligations shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of this state or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof, nor to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1510a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Construction or improvement of sewers as a local or district improvement within provisions authorizing or requiring special assessments or other specified means of defraying expense, 134 A.L.R. 895.

36-63-11. Construction of chapter generally; applicability of certain other provisions of law to proceedings under chapter; effect of chapter with respect to other development authorities.

Statute text

(a) This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof. Sale or issuance of bonds by any authority shall not be subject to regulation under Chapter 5 of Title 10, the "Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008," or any other law. Any sale or disposition of any useful form of energy produced from a solid waste project financed by revenue bonds issued on or before August 8, 1985, and which is substantially constructed as of January 1, 1987, which sale or disposition is made in the county wherein the project is located shall not be subject to the provisions of Part 3 of Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, "The Georgia Cogeneration Act of 1979." In the event that the immediately preceding sentence of this subsection shall for any reason be held invalid, the remaining provisions of this subsection and this Code section shall remain in full force and effect. No proceeding or publication not required in this chapter shall be necessary to the performance of any act authorized in this chapter, nor shall any such act be subject to referendum.

(b) A municipal corporation, a county, or any number of counties and municipal corporations shall have the right to activate an authority under this chapter, notwithstanding the existence of any other development authority within the county or municipal corporation created pursuant to any general law or amendment to the Constitution of this state. However, nothing in this chapter shall be construed as repealing, amending, superseding, or altering the organization of or abridging the powers of such authorities as are now in existence.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1509a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 36; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1694, § 3; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1021, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 11/SB 358.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, a comma was inserted following "invalid" in the fourth sentence of subsection (a).

——————————

CHAPTER 64

RECREATION SYSTEMS

Sec.

36-64-1. "Governing body" defined.

36-64-2. Authority to dedicate, set apart, acquire, or lease lands or buildings for recreation; appropriation for equipment and maintenance.

36-64-3. Establishment of system of supervised recreation; designation of board to provide and conduct recreational activities and facilities.

36-64-3.1. Use of dam sites and adjacent land for producing hydroelectric power.

36-64-4. Joint recreation systems.

36-64-5. Establishment of recreation board; powers and responsibilities; members; terms; officers; vacancies.

36-64-6. Acceptance of gifts for recreation purposes.

36-64-7. Issuance of bonds.

36-64-8. Petition for recreation system; provision of system on governing authority's own motion; referendums on issue of special tax and millage increase.

36-64-9. Establishment of system with tax money following favorable vote.

36-64-10. Levy and collection of recreation tax.

36-64-11. Payment of costs and expenses of recreation system; control of recreation fund.

36-64-12. Establishment, maintenance, and conduct of recreation system not mandatory.

36-64-13. Applicability of chapter generally.

36-64-14. Applicability of chapter to recreation and playground commissions, boards, and systems created by special Acts of General Assembly.

36-64-15. Removal of minimum or maximum recreation tax by municipality or county.

Annotations

Cross references. - Powers and duties of Department of Natural Resources regarding promotion and organization of recreational systems or programs for municipalities, counties, and other governmental entities, § 12-3-1.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Playground Accidents - Human Impact Tolerance, 21 POF2d 701.

Negligent Operation of Public Swimming Pool, 34 POF2d 63.

ALR. - Liability to one struck by golf ball, 53 A.L.R.4th 282.

Liability of local government entity for injury resulting from use of outdoor playground equipment at municipally owned park or recreation area, 73 A.L.R.4th 496.

36-64-1. "Governing body" defined.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term "governing body" means the mayor and city council, the commissioner and commissioners, or either or both as the case may be, or the governing body, by whatever name called, of any municipality or county coming under this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 1; Code 1933, § 69-601; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - This chapter does not impinge or offend the provisions of Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV). Wilson v. City Council, 165 Ga. 520, 141 S.E. 412 (1928).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 280.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 268.

36-64-2. Authority to dedicate, set apart, acquire, or lease lands or buildings for recreation; appropriation for equipment and maintenance.

Statute text

The governing body of any municipality or county may dedicate and set apart for use as parks, playgrounds, and recreation centers and for other recreation purposes any lands or buildings or both, owned or leased by such municipality or county and not dedicated or devoted to another or inconsistent public use. Such municipality or county, in such manner as may now or hereafter be authorized or provided by law for the acquisition of lands or buildings for public purposes by the municipality or county, may acquire or lease lands or buildings or both, within or beyond the corporate limits of the municipality, for parks, playgrounds, recreation centers, and other recreational purposes. When the governing body of the municipality so dedicates, sets apart, acquires, or leases lands or buildings for such purposes, it may, on its own initiative, provide for their conduct, equipment, and maintenance, according to this chapter, by making an appropriation from the general municipal or county funds.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 2; Code 1933, § 69-602; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 2.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

County may condemn private property for recreational park. - County is authorized by law to condemn private property for the public purpose of creating a recreational park. Williams Bros. Lumber Co. v. Gwinnett County, 258 Ga. 243, 368 S.E.2d 310 (1988).

Authority for contracts. - This section authorizes counties to enter into contracts so as to provide recreational facilities within a county. Hancock County v. Williams, 230 Ga. 723, 198 S.E.2d 659 (1973).

When a municipality dedicates property to a public use, the property may be put to all customary uses within the definition of the use. Any use which is inconsistent, or which substantially and materially interferes, with the use of the property for the particular purpose for which the property was dedicated will constitute a misuser or diversion. Norton v. City of Gainesville, 211 Ga. 387, 86 S.E.2d 234 (1955).

Municipal park is public utility, and portion thereof cannot be leased for term of years for private gain. Norton v. City of Gainesville, 211 Ga. 387, 86 S.E.2d 234 (1955); Harper v. City of Augusta, 212 Ga. 605, 94 S.E.2d 690 (1956).

Land may be dedicated for particular public use with reservation by proprietor of right to use the land for a specified purpose not inconsistent with the legal character of the dedication. City of Abbeville v. Jay, 205 Ga. 743, 55 S.E.2d 129 (1949).

General Assembly may vacate and dispose of park, owned by municipality, which has been dedicated to public use, or authority to do so may be delegated to the municipality, in the absence of constitutional prohibitions. Harper v. City of Augusta, 212 Ga. 605, 94 S.E.2d 690 (1956).

Distinction between land held in governmental and proprietary capacities. - There is a clear distinction between property purchased by a municipal corporation and held for use by the corporation as an entity, or in the municipality's proprietary capacity, and property purchased by the city for the public use and benefit of the city's citizens. As to property acquired for strictly corporate purposes and held in the city's proprietary capacity, the power to dispose is unquestioned, but as to the latter, in the absence of express legislative authority, it is only when the public use has been abandoned or the property has become unsuitable or inadequate for the purpose to which the property was dedicated that the city has power to dispose of such property. Harper v. City of Augusta, 212 Ga. 605, 94 S.E.2d 690 (1956).

City authorized to sell park land when held in fee and legislature grants authority. - When the city council owned the fee-simple title to a tract of land which had been dedicated to and used by the public as a park, and when the General Assembly expressly conferred upon the city authority to sell and dispose of that property upon conditions with which the city complied, the trial court did not err in holding that the city was authorized to make the sale. Harper v. City of Augusta, 212 Ga. 605, 94 S.E.2d 690 (1956).

When legislative power to authorize sale of park land cannot be questioned. - Legislative power to authorize the discontinuance of public parks and the sale of park lands cannot be questioned when the fee is in the city and when in so doing no private property is taken. Harper v. City of Augusta, 212 Ga. 605, 94 S.E.2d 690 (1956).

Dedicated land not liable to recall by original proprietor. - It is perfectly obvious that if a dedication of streets and squares was liable to be recalled at the will of the original proprietor, the most destructive hindrance would be thrown in the way of their improvement, and the rankest injustice would be visited upon individuals. City of Abbeville v. Jay, 205 Ga. 743, 55 S.E.2d 129 (1949).

Dedication of land to public use is in nature of estoppel in pais, and when an attempt is made by the proprietor to revoke the dedication by a sale of the land, the proprietor may be enjoined by any person interested in the use. City of Abbeville v. Jay, 205 Ga. 743, 55 S.E.2d 129 (1949).

Cited in City Council v. Newsome, 211 Ga. 899, 89 S.E.2d 485 (1955); City of Gainesville v. Pritchett, 129 Ga. App. 475, 199 S.E.2d 889 (1973); PMS Constr. Co. v. DeKalb County, 243 Ga. 870, 257 S.E.2d 285 (1979).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 23 Am. Jur. 2d, Dedication, § 4 et seq. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 181. 59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares, and Playgrounds, §§ 6, 24.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1995 et seq., 2000, 2001.

ALR. - To what uses may park property be devoted, 18 A.L.R. 1246; 63 A.L.R. 484; 144 A.L.R. 486.

Power of municipal corporation to establish and maintain golf course, 36 A.L.R. 1301.

Statutes relating to establishment or administration of parks, as encroachment on right of local self-government, 88 A.L.R. 228.

Auditorium or stadium as public purpose for which public funds may be expended or taxing power exercised, 173 A.L.R. 415.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance requiring land developer to dedicate portion of land for recreational purposes, or make payment in lieu thereof, 43 A.L.R.3d 862.

Public swimming pool as nuisance, 49 A.L.R.3d 652.

Construction of highway through park as violation of use to which park property may be devoted, 60 A.L.R.3d 581.

36-64-3. Establishment of system of supervised recreation; designation of board to provide and conduct recreational activities and facilities.

Statute text

The governing body of any county or municipality may establish a system of supervised recreation. It may, by resolution or ordinance, vest the power to provide, maintain, and conduct parks, playgrounds, recreation centers, and other recreational activities and facilities in the board of education, park board, or other existing body or in a recreation board, as the governing body may determine. Any board so designated shall have the power to maintain and equip parks, playgrounds, recreation centers, and the buildings thereon; to develop, maintain, and operate all types of recreation facilities; and to operate and conduct facilities on properties controlled by other authorities. It may, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, employ playleaders, playground or community center directors, supervisors, recreation superintendents, or such other officers or employees as it deems are needed. The recreation authority is authorized to develop a program of recreational activities and services designated to meet the various leisure time interests of all people.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 3; Code 1933, § 69-603; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City of Gainesville v. Pritchett, 129 Ga. App. 475, 199 S.E.2d 889 (1973).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

City may derive revenue from operation of recreational programs and may even show a profit from a particular recreational activity. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 66-85.

City recreation department may sponsor teenage dances and charge an admission fee to those wishing to attend the dances. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 66-85.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 181. 59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares, and Playgrounds, § 20.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1995 et seq.

ALR. - Liability of municipal corporation for injuries due to condition in park, 42 A.L.R. 263; 99 A.L.R. 686; 142 A.L.R. 1340.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents occurring during use of premises and equipment for other than school purposes, 37 A.L.R.3d 712.

Public swimming pool as nuisance, 49 A.L.R.3d 652.

36-64-3.1. Use of dam sites and adjacent land for producing hydroelectric power.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "governing authority of any recreation system" shall mean the governing body of a municipality or county, a recreation board, or any other authority, board, or commission which is vested with the power to provide, establish, conduct, and maintain a supervised recreation system and facilities.

(b) The governing authority of any recreation system shall be empowered, for the purpose of producing hydroelectric power for ultimate sale to the public, to take all necessary or appropriate actions to permit the renovation, reconstruction, and operation of existing dam sites located on property which is owned by the governing authority, including land that has been dedicated for public recreational or park use, without regard to whether such public use has been previously abandoned.

(c) Without limiting the foregoing provisions of this Code section, the governing authority of any recreation system shall have the power, for the purposes specified in subsection (b) of this Code section, to grant or convey, and to grant an option to obtain, a leasehold interest, a fee simple title, or other property interest in any such dam site and in such immediately adjacent land as may be necessary to accommodate facilities for the generation of hydroelectric power, together with all easements, rights of way, and rights to flood adjacent lands as may be necessary or appropriate, to electric utilities or other entities organized for the purpose of generating or distributing electricity for public use.

(d) The governing authority of any recreation system also shall have the power, for the purposes specified in subsection (b) of this Code section, to enter into any contracts necessary or appropriate to determine the feasibility of renovating an existing dam for the generation of hydroelectric power; to enter into any contracts with electric utilities or other entities organized for the purpose of generating or distributing electricity for public use which are necessary or appropriate for the construction, use, operation, and maintenance of a hydroelectric facility at an existing dam site located on property owned by the governing authority; and to take all actions necessary or appropriate to obtain, and to transfer its rights under, any governmental license or other approval or exemption required or desired for a hydroelectric project.

(e) All conveyances and other contracts, including those extending over a period of years, which are entered into by the governing authority of any recreation system for the purposes specified in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be binding upon such governing authority and its successors.

(f) Any net revenue derived by the governing authority of a recreation system from such conveyances and other contracts shall be used only for recreational purposes.

(g) This Code section shall apply to and control the activities of a governing authority of any recreation system in connection with the renovation, reconstruction, and operation of any dam site located on property owned by the governing authority, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in this chapter or in Code Section 36-30-3 or in any other laws; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed as impairing the obligation of any contract provision, whether by way of reversionary clause or otherwise.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 1020, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Dam safety, § 12-5-370 et seq.

Authority of persons constructing or operating electric generating plants to acquire rights of way or other easements to run power lines, maintain dams, and do other things, § 22-3-20.

Construction, operation of watershed projects, flood-control projects by counties, § 22-3-100 et seq.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Lease recommendation for hydroelectric power unauthorized. - Board of Natural Resources is not authorized by subsection (b) of O.C.G.A. § 36-64-3.1 to recommend by resolution to the State Properties Commission a lease for producing, on state owned lands which the Department of Natural Resources manages, hydroelectric power for use by the department and ultimate sale to the public. 1983 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 83-47.

36-64-4. Joint recreation systems.

Statute text

Any two or more counties, any two or more municipalities, any county and municipality, any county or municipality, or combination thereof may jointly provide, establish, maintain, and conduct a recreation system and jointly acquire property for and establish and maintain playgrounds, recreation centers, parks, and other recreational facilities and activities. Any school board may join with any municipality, county, or any other school board in conducting and maintaining a recreation system.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 5; Code 1933, § 69-605; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 5; Ga. L. 1964, p. 319, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 262, § 2.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Joint provision of recreation. - While county may not legally donate funds to assist a city in constructing a swimming pool, the county and city may jointly provide, establish, maintain, and conduct such system. 1952-53 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 289.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 192.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1150 et seq.

36-64-5. Establishment of recreation board; powers and responsibilities; members; terms; officers; vacancies.

Statute text

If the governing body of any county or municipality determines that the power to provide, establish, conduct, and maintain a recreation system should be exercised by a park or recreation board, such governing body, by resolution or ordinance, shall establish a recreation board in such municipality or county which shall possess all the powers and be subject to all the responsibilities of local authorities under this chapter. The board, when established, shall consist of a minimum of five persons and a maximum of nine persons, serving without pay, to be appointed by the mayor or presiding officer of the county or municipality. The terms of office of the members of the board shall be for five years or until their successors are appointed and qualified, except that the appointing authority, in making initial appointments or in filling vacancies, is authorized and directed to vary the initial terms of members or the terms of persons appointed to fill vacancies in such a manner that thereafter the term of at least one member shall expire annually. Immediately after its appointment, the board shall meet and organize by electing one of its members president and such other officers as may be necessary. Vacancies in the board occurring otherwise than by expiration of term shall be filled by the mayor or presiding officer of the governing body only for the unexpired term, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 4; Code 1933, § 69-604; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 4; Ga. L. 1971, p. 262, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Prohibition of dissolution of authority without paying creditors. - It would be unconscionable, perhaps even unconstitutional, for a governmental body to create a separate legal entity capable of incurring debts, to reap benefits from purchases made by the entity, and then to dissolve the entity with an express prohibition against paying any of the creditors, and therefore the trial court erred in granting summary judgment for the city in suit by a creditor to collect a bill for recreational supplies allegedly purchased by a municipal recreation authority prior to the authority's dissolution. Got-It Hdwe. & Gifts, Inc. v. City of Ashburn, 155 Ga. App. 214, 270 S.E.2d 380 (1980).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares, and Playgrounds, § 12.

36-64-6. Acceptance of gifts for recreation purposes.

Statute text

A park or recreation board or other authority in which is vested the power to provide, establish, maintain, and conduct a recreation program may accept any grant or devise of real estate or any gift or bequest of money or other personal property or any donation, the principal or income of which is to be applied for either temporary or permanent use for playgrounds or recreation purposes. If the acceptance thereof for such purposes will subject the county or municipality to additional expense for improvements, maintenance, or renewal, the acceptance of any grant or devise of real estate shall be subject to the approval of the governing body of the county or municipality. Money received for such purposes, unless otherwise provided by the terms of the gift or bequest, shall be deposited with the treasurer of the county or municipality to the account of the recreation board or commission or other body having charge of such work or shall be deposited directly with the recreation board; it shall be withdrawn and paid out by such body in the same manner as money appropriated for recreation purposes.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 6; Code 1933, § 69-606; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 6.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Further provisions regarding devises and gifts of property to municipalities for parks or other public purposes, § 36-37-1.

Acceptance of donations or gifts of property by municipal corporations generally, § 36-37-2.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 470, 471.

36-64-7. Issuance of bonds.

Statute text

The governing body of any municipality or county, pursuant to law, may provide that the bonds of the municipality or county may be issued, in the manner provided by law for the issuance of bonds for other purposes, for the purpose of acquiring lands or buildings for parks, playgrounds, recreation centers, and other recreational purposes and for the equipment thereof.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 7; Code 1933, § 69-607; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 7.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 549, 562. 59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares, and Playgrounds, § 12. 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 88, 89.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2122, 2123.

ALR. - Assignment and transfer of government bonds, 22 A.L.R. 775.

36-64-8. Petition for recreation system; provision of system on governing authority's own motion; referendums on issue of special tax and millage increase.

Statute text

(a) Whenever a petition signed by at least 10 percent of the qualified and registered voters in any municipality or county is filed in the office of the clerk of the municipality or county, requesting the governing body of the municipality or county to provide, establish, maintain, and conduct a supervised recreation system and to levy an annual tax on the taxable property within the municipality or county for the conduct and maintenance thereof, it shall be the duty of the governing body to appropriate funds for and to provide for the establishment, maintenance, and conduct of a supervised recreation system or, if the question of a special tax is raised by the petition, to cause the question of the establishment, maintenance, and conduct of such supervised recreation system to be submitted to the voters to be voted upon at the next general or special election of the municipality or county; provided, however, that such question shall not be voted upon at the next general or special election unless such petition has been filed at least 30 days prior to the date of such election.

(b) In addition to the method provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the governing authority of any municipality or county, upon its own motion, may appropriate funds for and provide for the establishment, maintenance, and conduct of a supervised recreation system or, if a special tax is necessary, upon its own motion may cause the question of the establishment, maintenance, and conduct of such supervised recreation system to be submitted to the voters to be voted upon at the next general or special election of the municipality or county, provided such motion has been made at least 30 days prior to the date of such election.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall permit the levying of a tax in excess of any limitation contained in a municipal charter or, with reference to a county, in excess of the authority set out by the Constitution and laws of this state; provided, however, that any municipality is authorized to levy a tax in excess of any limitation contained in its municipal charter if a referendum is held and a majority of the qualified voters of the municipality voting in such election vote in favor of the millage increase.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 8; Code 1933, § 69-608; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 8; Ga. L. 1953, p. 30, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 553, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 213, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 42 Am. Jur. 2d, Initiative and Referendum, §§ 1, 6, 7, 37 et seq. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 514, 572. 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 231. 71 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 95, 97, 98, 100.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2234 et seq.

36-64-9. Establishment of system with tax money following favorable vote.

Statute text

Upon the adoption of the proposition at an election conducted pursuant to Code Section 36-64-8, the governing body of the municipality or county, by resolution or ordinance, shall provide for the establishment, maintenance, and conduct of the supervised recreation system as they may deem it advisable and practicable to provide and maintain out of the tax money thus voted. The governing body, by appropriate resolution or ordinance, may designate the board or commission to be vested with the powers, duties, and obligations necessary for the establishment, maintenance, and conduct of such recreation system, as provided in this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 9; Code 1933, § 69-609; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 9.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 42 Am. Jur. 2d, Initiative and Referendum, § 49.

36-64-10. Levy and collection of recreation tax.

Statute text

The governing body of any municipality or county or school district adopting the provisions of this chapter at an election shall thereafter annually levy and collect a tax sufficient to provide for an adequate recreation program for the area specified, of not less than the minimum nor more than the maximum amount set out in the petition for the election, which tax shall be designated as the "recreation tax" and shall be levied and collected in the same manner as the general tax of the municipality, county, or school district.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 10; Code 1933, § 69-610; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 10.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 514. 59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares, and Playgrounds, §§ 5, 6. 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, §§ 25, 34. 71 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 47, 53.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2233 et seq., 2276, 2277, 2495.

36-64-11. Payment of costs and expenses of recreation system; control of recreation fund.

Statute text

The cost and expense of the establishment, maintenance, and conduct of a supervised recreation system of parks, playgrounds, recreation centers, and other recreational facilities and activities shall be paid out of taxes or other money received for this purpose. The recreation board or commission or other authority in which is vested the power to provide, establish, conduct, and maintain a supervised recreation system and facilities shall have exclusive control of all moneys collected or donated to the credit of the "recreation fund."

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 11; Code 1933, § 69-611; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 11.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Rabun County Recreation Bd. v. Jarrard, 150 Ga. App. 56, 256 S.E.2d 661 (1979).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 514.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2497, 2498.

36-64-12. Establishment, maintenance, and conduct of recreation system not mandatory.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be mandatory that a municipality or county establish, maintain, or conduct a recreation system.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 553, § 2.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Jonesboro Area Athletic Ass'n v. Dickson, 227 Ga. 513, 181 S.E.2d 852 (1971); Rabun County Recreation Bd. v. Jarrard, 150 Ga. App. 56, 256 S.E.2d 661 (1979).

36-64-13. Applicability of chapter generally.

Statute text

This chapter shall apply to all counties and municipalities in this state.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 1; Code 1933, § 69-601; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - This chapter does not impinge or offend the provisions of Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV). Wilson v. City Council, 165 Ga. 520, 141 S.E. 412 (1928).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Statutes relating to establishment or administration of parks, as encroachment on right of local self-government, 88 A.L.R. 228.

36-64-14. Applicability of chapter to recreation and playground commissions, boards, and systems created by special Acts of General Assembly.

Statute text

This chapter shall not apply to recreation or playground commissions, boards, or systems which are created by special Acts of the General Assembly.

History

(Ga. L. 1923, p. 106, § 11a; Code 1933, § 69-612; Ga. L. 1946, p. 152, § 11A.)

36-64-15. Removal of minimum or maximum recreation tax by municipality or county.

Statute text

(a) If a municipality or county has adopted the provisions of this chapter at an election, thereby establishing a minimum recreation tax, a maximum recreation tax, or a minimum and maximum recreation tax, then such minimum or maximum or both may be removed as provided in this Code section.

(b) In order to so remove the minimum or maximum or both, the governing body of the municipality or county shall adopt a resolution to that effect, subject to approval by a majority of the voters of the municipality or county at the next general or special election of the municipality or county which is held more than 45 days after the date of the adoption of the resolution by the governing body. Such resolution shall specify the ballot language to be used in presenting the question and the governing body shall provide a copy of the resolution to the appropriate election officials. If a majority of the voters voting on the question of removal vote in favor, the minimum or maximum or both shall be removed as presented to the voters.

(c) Where a minimum or maximum or both has or have been removed as authorized by this Code section, the amount of municipal or county funding for the recreation system of the municipality or county shall thereafter be determined by the governing body of the municipality or county in its discretion; and the municipal or county governing body shall assume budgetary control over the recreation fund and any moneys therein.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-64-15, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 740, § 1/HB 1024.)

——————————

CHAPTER 65

IMMUNITY FROM ANTITRUST LIABILITY

Sec.

36-65-1. Statement of policy.

36-65-2. Immunity of local governments from antitrust liability.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This chapter and Code Sections 36-65-1 and 36-65-2 were originally enacted as Chapter 19 of this title and Code Sections 36-19-1 [repealed] and 36-19-2, respectively, by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1337, § 1. The present chapter and Code section designations were made by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 36.

Law reviews. - For article, "Antitrust," see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 1047 (1993). For article, "President Trump's Antitrust Division: An Essay on the Same Old, Same Old," see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 671 (2019).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Immunity from federal antitrust liability. - City's anticompetitive operation of a waterworks is protected from federal antitrust liability by the state action immunity doctrine under Parker v. Brown, 317 U.S. 341, 63 S. Ct. 307, 87 L. Ed. 315 (1943), and its progeny. McCallum v. City of Athens, 976 F.2d 649 (11th Cir. 1992).

36-65-1. Statement of policy.

Statute text

It is declared by the General Assembly of Georgia that in the exercise of powers specifically granted to them by law, local governing authorities of cities and counties are acting pursuant to state policy.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-19-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1337, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-65-1, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Tying of water-utility service to natural gas service. - Claim of state-action immunity did not entitle a city to dismissal of a suit alleging the city violated the Sherman and Clayton Acts by tying its water-utility service to its natural gas service for some customers because Georgia's policy to displace federal antitrust law as to municipal anticompetitive conduct in providing water and sewage services does not have as an inherent, logical, or ordinary result that cities would use their water monopoly to increase their share of an unrelated market. Diverse Power, Inc. v. City of Lagrange, 934 F.3d 1270 (11th Cir. 2019).

Cited in Pine Ridge Recycling, Inc. v. Butts County, 855 F. Supp. 1264 (M.D. Ga. 1994).

36-65-2. Immunity of local governments from antitrust liability.

Statute text

This chapter is intended to articulate clearly and express affirmatively the policy of the State of Georgia that in the exercise of such powers, such local governing authorities shall be immune from antitrust liability to the same degree and extent as enjoyed by the State of Georgia.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-19-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1337, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-65-2, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Garbage collection services contracts. - County's alleged anti-

competitive conduct in enacting an ordinance authorizing the county to enter into a contract with a private enterprise for garbage collection was expressly contemplated by the Georgia Comprehensive Solid Waste Management Act, O.C.G.A. § 12-8-20 et seq., and, thus, the county was immune from state and federal antitrust laws. Strykr v. Long County Bd. of Comm'rs, 277 Ga. 624, 593 S.E.2d 348 (2004).

Tying of water-utility service to natural gas service. - Claim of state-action immunity did not entitle a city to dismissal of a suit alleging the city violated the Sherman and Clayton Acts by tying its water-utility service to its natural gas service for some customers because Georgia's policy to displace federal antitrust law as to municipal anticompetitive conduct in providing water and sewage services does not have as an inherent, logical, or ordinary result that cities would use their water monopoly to increase their share of an unrelated market. Diverse Power, Inc. v. City of Lagrange, 934 F.3d 1270 (11th Cir. 2019).

——————————

CHAPTER 66

ZONING PROCEDURES

Sec.

36-66-1. Short title.

36-66-2. Legislative purpose; local government zoning powers.

36-66-3. Definitions.

36-66-4. Hearings on proposed zoning decisions; notice of hearing; nongovernmental initiated actions; reconsideration of defeated actions; procedure on zoning for property annexed into municipality.

36-66-5. Adoption of hearing policies and procedures and standards for exercise of zoning power.

36-66-6. Investigations and recommendations of planning department regarding land near military installation.

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, Chapter 66, as enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p, 117, § 1, was redesignated as Chapter 67.
